Utah statutes.
79-3-205.   Investigatory powers and immunities of survey personnel.
(1)  Authorized survey personnel, after providing reasonable notification and
identification, have the right to enter all lands subject to the police power
of the state for the purpose of securing geologic, topographic, and mineral
and water resource information or specimens and samples required by the survey
in fulfillment of its objectives.
(2)  Survey personnel are immune from trespass while engaged on official
business.
